Nebraska, session 109, LB140.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Cell phone means a mobile or cellular telephone; and
(b) Electronic communication device means any device which transmits by
electronic means any writing, sound, visual image, or data of any nature to
another electronic communication device. Electronic communication device
includes a cell phone.
(2)(a) Prior to school year 2025-26, each school board of a public school
district shall adopt a policy that establishes rules and standards concerning
use of electronic communication devices by students while on school property or
attending a school instructional function. The development of the policy shall
include stakeholder participation to ensure that such policies are responsive
to the unique needs and desires of students, parents, and educators in each
community. Such policy:
(i) Shall, except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection,
prohibit the use of an electronic communication device by students while on
school property or attending a school instructional function; and
(ii) May include student discipline and enforcement mechanisms that limit
access to electronic communication devices by students only if the school board
adopts such policy as part of the rules and standards adopted in accordance
with the requirements of section 79-262.
(b) A policy adopted pursuant to this section shall not prohibit a student
from using an electronic communication device while on school property or
attending a school instructional function under any of the following
circumstances:
(i) When required by a student's individualized education program
developed under the Special Education Act and any rules and regulations adopted
or promulgated pursuant to the act or a plan developed under section 504 of the
federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794;
(ii) When authorized by the school district for educational purposes
during instructional time;
(iii) In the case of an emergency or perceived threat of danger;
(iv) When necessary to monitor or manage a student's health care; or
(v) When determined appropriate by the school board or otherwise allowed
by an appropriate school employee.
(3) This section should not be interpreted to authorize monitoring,
collecting, or otherwise accessing any information on an electronic
communication device not owned by or provided for academic use by the school
district.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-